Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 2. Use of Water in Fontenelle Reservoir

§§ 9-2-201 through 9-2-210.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 235, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 94, §§ 1, 4 to 6, 7 to 16, related to the department of economic planning and development.

§ 9-2-211.
Purchase of storage capacity in Fontenelle Reservoir; governor authorized to contract therefor; powers of commission; limitations on negotiation of contracts for water use.

The governor may negotiate, execute and deliver a contract between the United States of America and the state for the purchase by the state of sixty thousand (60,000) acre-feet of storage capacity in Fontenelle Reservoir with any rights or appurtenances thereto. The total cost of the purchase shall not exceed nine million twenty-six thousand dollars ($9,026,000.00) for capital costs together with funded interest at the rate of two and six hundred thirty-two thousandths percent (2.632%) from December 31, 1968, to the date of the commencement of payments. All costs shall be paid in not more than forty (40) annual installments of principal plus interest at the rate of two and six hundred thirty-two thousandths percent (2.632%) per annum.

If the governor executes a contract under subsection (a) of this section, the water development commission may:

Formulate and develop comprehensive plans for the development, utilization and sale to potential users of the yield of water stored in Fontenelle Reservoir;

Consult with and advise water users of the availability of the yield of storage water from Fontenelle Reservoir and the most practicable methods of water development and distribution;

Enter into contracts for furnishing the water yielded from the storage of Fontenelle Reservoir to water users based on their reasonable needs. All contracts for use of the water shall be approved by the governor and the state engineer;

Set service rates charged for furnishing water from Fontenelle Reservoir. The revenue received from the charges shall be used to repay the contractual obligation of the state to the United States of America for the purchase of the water storage capacity and water rights. The service rates shall be sufficient to pay all costs, including cost of water, interest, operating costs and administration costs and to return to the state an amount equal to the maximum rate of interest then being received by the state on investment of its permanent funds;

File with the state engineer’s office contracts negotiated with water users and provide the state engineer with information which will enable him to accurately account for and identify water sold and used pursuant to this section.

The water development commission may negotiate contracts with water users only where the proposed use can be accomplished in a manner which will not injure or impair valid existing water rights.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 268, § 6.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 128, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-160.38, 9-160.39; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-320, 9-3-321; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 235, § 2; 1989, ch. 268, § 6; 1990, ch. 44, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to duties of state engineer, see §

9-1-902

.